Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 1439, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1439. The Oklahoma Citizens Participation Act shall not
apply to:
1. An enforcement action that is brought in the name of this
state or a political subdivision of this state by the Attorney
General or a district attorney;
2. A legal action brought against a person primarily engaged in
the business of selling or leasing goods or services, if the
statement or conduct the action is based upon arises out of the sale
or lease of goods, services, or an insurance product, insurance
Req. No. 12919 Page 1

serv ices, or a commercial transaction in which the intended audience
is an actual or potential buyer or customer;
3. A legal action seeking recovery for bodily injury, wrongful
death or survival or to statements made regarding that legal action;
4. A legal action brought under the Oklahoma Insurance Code or
arising out of an insurance contract; or
5. A civil action brought under Section 5 of this act A civil
action arising from an officer-director, employee-employer, or
independent contractor relationship that:
a. seeks recovery for misappropriation of trade secrets
or corporate opportunities, or
b. seeks to enforce a non-disparagement agreement,
covenant not to compete, nondisclosure agreement, or
confidentiality agreement.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12919 MAH 02/25/25







Req. No. 12919 Page 2